Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.035

Qualifications—Coursework on issues of abuse; sexual abuse and exploitation of a minor; and emotional or behavioral distress in students, including possible substance abuse, violence, and youth suicide.

(1) To receive initial certification as a teacher in this state after August 31, 1991, an applicant shall have successfully completed a course on issues of abuse. The content of the course shall discuss the identification of physical abuse, emotional abuse, sexual abuse, and substance abuse; commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.100; sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040; information on the impact of abuse on the behavior and learning abilities of students; discussion of the responsibilities of a teacher to report abuse or provide assistance to students who are the victims of abuse; and methods for teaching students about abuse of all types and their prevention.

(2) The professional educator standards board shall incorporate into the content required for the course under this section, knowledge and skill standards pertaining to recognition, initial screening, and response to emotional or behavioral distress in students, including but not limited to indicators of possible substance abuse, violence, and youth suicide. To receive initial certification after August 31, 2014, an applicant must have successfully completed a course that includes the content of this subsection. The board shall consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of health in developing the standards.

[ 2013 c 197 s 3; 2013 c 10 s 2; 1990 c 90 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.405.025.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2013 c 10 s 2 and by 2013 c 197 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Finding—Intent—2013 c 197: See note following RCW 43.20A.765.

Findings—Intent—2013 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.410.226.

Finding—2013 c 10: "The legislature finds that when teachers and school staff are trained in identifying and preventing child sexual abuse, commercial sexual abuse of minors, and sexual exploitation of minors, students benefit." [ 2013 c 10 s 1.]

Civil liability—2013 c 197: See RCW 28A.310.501.